Hawaii statutes.
§806-62 Trial; order of proof and argument.
The prosecuting attorney shall open the case, and first introduce his witnesses
and proofs, and after the evidence for the defense has been presented, and the
accused or his counsel has summed up and closed his case, the prosecuting
attorney may conclude the argument, and in his conclusion shall confine himself
to answering any new matter or arguments presented by the defendant or his
attorney. [L 1876, c 40, §45; am imp L 1907, c 37, §1; RL 1925, §4025; RL 1935,
§5526; RL 1945, §10831; RL 1955, §258-41; HRS §711-62; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1]

Cross References

Evidence, generally, see chapters 621 and 626.

Order of proof, argument, see §635-52.

Rules of Court

Testimony, see HRPP rule 26.

Expert witnesses, see HRPP rule 28.

Instructions to jury, see HRPP rule 30.

Motion for judgment of acquittal, see HRPP rule 29.

Case Notes

Prosecution rather than defendant may close the argument. 9
H. 288 (1893).

Opening statement. 31 H. 81 (1929); 32 H. 528 (1932).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next